Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8031.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 45-22.2 of the General Laws entitled "Rhode Island Comprehensive
Planning and Land Use Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-22.2-12.1. Extension of municipal comprehensive plan deadlines.
(a) Upon written request of a city or town, the Rhode Island division of statewide planning
("the division") may grant an extension of the deadline for the update of a municipal comprehensive
plan for a period not to exceed twelve (12) months; provided that, the municipality has
demonstrated active engagement in the comprehensive plan update process, as determined by the
division, toward the preparation and submission of an update in accordance with this chapter.
(b) In determining whether a municipality has demonstrated active engagement in the
update process, the division may consider, but shall not be limited to, whether the municipality has:
(1) Initiated the comprehensive plan update process;
(2) Engaged or procured professional planning or consulting services;
(3) Conducted public outreach, workshops, or hearings;
(4) Coordinated with state agencies or the division; or
(5) Submitted draft materials or documentation for preliminary or formal review.
(c) During any extension granted pursuant to this section, the municipality’s existing
comprehensive plan shall be deemed to remain in full force and effect for all purposes including,
but not limited to, zoning consistency, regulatory compliance, and eligibility for state or federal

funding.
(d) A municipality may be granted one extension pursuant to this section.
(e) The division may issue guidance or procedures necessary to implement the provisions
of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005091
========
LC005091 - Page 2 of 3